Missouri, session 2026, HB3243.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 210, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 210.168, to read as follows:
210.168. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "MO Families
First Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Child", any person under eighteen years of age;
(2) "Division", the Missouri children's division within the department of social
services;
(3) "Federal enforcement action", any arrest, detention, removal, or deportation
proceeding initiated by a federal law enforcement or immigration authority;
(4) "Parent or legal guardian", a biological parent, adoptive parent, legal
guardian, or other individual legally responsible for the care and custody of a child;
(5) "State system", any public school, charter school, licensed child care facility,
foster care program, juvenile justice facility, or state-funded program serving children.
3. If a state agency or educational institution becomes aware that a parent or
legal guardian of a child receiving services through a state system has been subject to a
federal enforcement action, such agency or institution shall notify the division within
twenty-four hours of receiving such information.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3243 2
4. Upon receipt of notification under subsection 3 of this section, the division
shall promptly initiate an assessment to determine:
(1) The child's immediate safety and well-being;
(2) The availability of appropriate caregivers, including relatives or other
individuals with an established relationship to the child;
(3) The child's immediate needs, including housing, medical care, and emotional
support; and
(4) The child's educational placement and continuity needs.
5. In determining appropriate placement, the division shall, consistent with
existing child welfare laws and safety standards:
(1) Give priority to placement with a fit and willing relative or known caregiver
if such placement is in the best interest of the child;
(2) Make reasonable efforts to preserve sibling relationships;
(3) Consider the child's existing relationships, community ties, and cultural
connections;
(4) When appropriate and safe, consult with the parent or legal guardian
regarding preferred placement arrangements.
6. School districts and educational institutions shall make reasonable efforts to
maintain educational stability for a child affected under this section, including
preservation of records and coordination with the division, so long as the child
remains enrolled or placed within the school district or educational institution.
7. The division shall provide families with information regarding options for
establishing temporary or permanent guardianship and coordinate, when available,
with legal service providers to assist families in understanding such options.
8. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Interfere with federal immigration enforcement authority;
(2) Require any state or local agency to inquire into or report the immigration
status of any individual;
(3) Create a private cause of action against the state or any state agency; or
(4) Alter existing mandatory reporting requirements relating to child abuse or
neglect.
9. The division may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to

HB 3243 3
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔